Wisconsin, session 2025, AB76.
do enact as follows:AB76,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:AB76,2,7271.05 (6) (b) 57. a. Subject to the definitions in subd. 57. b. and c. and the 3limitations specified in subd. 57. d., e., f., g., h., and i. for taxable years beginning 4after December 31, 2024, and before January 1, 2030 an amount of income, up to 5$100,000 or $200,000, earned in this state by a psychiatrist from the practice of 6psychiatry or by a psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner providing 7psychiatric or mental health services in the taxable year to which the claim relates.AB76,3,28b. In this subdivision, “income” means all remuneration for services 9performed by a psychiatrist for an employer and net earnings from self-employment 10derived solely from the practice of psychiatry and all remuneration for services 11performed by a psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner and net earnings 1from self-employment derived solely from providing psychiatric or mental health 2services as a psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner.AB76,3,73bm. In this subdivision, “psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner” 4means a nurse licensed under ch. 441 or who holds a multistate license, as defined 5in 441.51 (2) (h), issued in a party state, as defined in s. 441.51 (2) (k), who practices 6primarily as a psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner and is currently 7certified by a national certifying body approved by the board of nursing.AB76,3,88c. In this subdivision, “psychiatrist” has the meaning given in s. 457.01 (8e).AB76,3,139d. A psychiatrist must begin to claim the subtraction under this subdivision 10within the first 2 years that he or she begins practicing psychiatry within this state 11or within the first 2 years that he or she returns to this state to practice psychiatry 12after practicing psychiatry in another state, or the psychiatrist may not claim the 13subtraction in any future years.AB76,3,2014dm. A psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner must begin to claim the 15subtraction under this subdivision within the first 2 years that he or she begins 16practicing as a psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner within this state or 17within the first 2 years that he or she returns to this state to practice as a 18psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner after practicing as a psychiatric or 19mental health nurse practitioner in another state, or the psychiatric or mental 20health nurse practitioner may not claim the subtraction in any future years.AB76,3,2221e. An individual may claim the subtraction under this subdivision for no more 22than 5 taxable years.AB76,4,21f. An individual may claim the subtraction under this subdivision only during 2the 5-year period that begins with the first year he or she claims the credit.AB76,4,73g. If an individual is a full-year resident of this state and is not eligible to 4claim the subtraction in one or more years during the period described in subd. 57. 5f., the claimant may again claim the subtraction in a future year if he or she is 6eligible to do so in that future taxable year, except that the subtraction must occur 7within the 5-year period that began as described in subd. 57. f.AB76,4,138h. If an individual begins to claim the subtraction under this subdivision but 9is unable to claim the subtraction for 5 consecutive years because he or she leaves 10the state, the claimant shall add to the tax due for the taxable year during which 11the individual leaves the state, an amount equal to the total gross tax that would 12have been due if the subtraction under this subdivision was not claimed for any year 13less the amount of gross tax actually due for those years.AB76,4,1914i. A psychiatrist or psychiatric or mental health nurse practitioner may 15subtract up to $200,000, as described in subd. 57. a., only if he or she practices or 16performs psychiatric or mental health services in a medically underserved area, as 17defined in s. 39.385 (1) (e), and may subtract up to $100,000, as described in subd. 1857. a., if he or she does not practice or perform psychiatric or mental health services 19in such an area.AB76,220Section 2. 71.53 (2) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB76,4,222171.53 (2) (g) The claimant is eligible for and claims the subtraction under s. 2271.05 (6) (b) 57. for the taxable year to which a claim under this subchapter relates.AB76,323Section 3. 71.77 (9) of the statutes is created to read:AB76,5,3171.77 (9) Notwithstanding sub. (2), the department may make an assessment 2within one year of the date the taxpayer becomes ineligible for the subtraction 3under s. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. to recover all or part of the subtraction.AB76,5,44